District of Columbia statutes.
47-1022

Young Women’s Christian Association — Property.

All property of the Young Women’s Christian Association of the District of Columbia located in the District of Columbia and occupied and used by such Association for its legitimate purposes shall be exempt from all national and municipal taxation so long as such property is so occupied and used.

June 16, 1938, 52 Stat. 709, ch. 461, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1022.
1973 Ed., § 47-815.